Nevada, session 83, AB521.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 449 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Statewide Central Registry” means the Statewide Central
Registry for the Collection of Information Concerning the Abuse
or Neglect of a Child established by NRS 432.100.
Sec. 2. NRS 449.001 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.001 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 449.0015 to
449.0195, inclusive, and section 1 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 449.122 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.122 1. Each applicant for a license to operate a facility,
hospital, agency, program or home shall submit [to] :
(a) To the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History one complete set of fingerprints for submission to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report [.] ; and
(b) Written authorization to the Division for the release of any
information that may be available from the Statewide Central
Registry and any equivalent registry maintained by a
governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the applicant has
resided within the immediately preceding 5 years to determine
whether there has been a substantiated report of child abuse or
neglect made against the applicant.
2. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History shall determine whether the applicant has been convicted of
a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 449.174 and
immediately inform the administrator of the facility, hospital,
agency, program or home, if any, and the Division of whether the
applicant has been convicted of such a crime.
3. A person who holds a license to operate a facility, hospital,
agency, program or home which provides residential services to
children, a psychiatric hospital that provides inpatient services to
children or a psychiatric residential treatment facility shall submit
[to] :
(a) To the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History one complete set of fingerprints for a report required by this
section at least once every 5 years after the initial investigation [.] ;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) Written authorization to the Division for the release of any
information that may be available from the Statewide Central
Registry to determine whether there has been a substantiated
report of child abuse or neglect made against the person at least
once every 5 years after the initial investigation.
Sec. 4. NRS 449.123 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.123 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3, within 10 days after hiring an employee, accepting an employee
of a temporary employment service or entering into a contract with
an independent contractor, the administrator of, or the person
licensed to operate a facility, hospital, agency, program or home
shall:
(a) Obtain a written statement from the employee, employee of
the temporary employment service or independent contractor stating
whether he or she has been convicted of any crime listed in
NRS 449.174;
(b) Obtain an oral and written confirmation of the information
contained in the written statement obtained pursuant to
paragraph (a);
(c) Obtain proof that the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor holds any required
license, permit or certificate;
(d) Obtain from the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor one set of
fingerprints and a written authorization to forward the fingerprints to
the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report;
(e) Submit to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History the fingerprints obtained pursuant to paragraph (d)
to obtain information on the background and personal history of
each employee, employee of a temporary employment service or
independent contractor to determine whether the person has been
convicted of any crime listed in NRS 449.174; [and]
(f) Obtain written authorization from the employee, employee
of the temporary employment service or independent contractor
for the release of any information that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry and any equivalent registry maintained
by a governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the employee,
employee of the temporary employment service or independent
contractor has resided within the immediately preceding 5 years to
determine whether there has been a substantiated report of child
abuse or neglect made against the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(g) If an Internet website has been established pursuant to
NRS 439.942:
(1) Screen the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor using the Internet
website. Upon request of the Division, proof that the employee,
temporary employee or independent contractor was screened
pursuant to this subparagraph must be provided to the Division.
(2) Enter on the Internet website information to be
maintained on the website concerning the employee, employee of
the temporary employment service or independent contractor.
2. The administrator of, or the person licensed to operate, a
facility, hospital, agency, program or home is not required to obtain
the information described in subsection 1 , other than the
information described in paragraph (f) of subsection 1, from an
employee, employee of a temporary employment service or
independent contractor if his or her fingerprints have been submitted
to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History
for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report
within the immediately preceding 6 months and the report of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation indicated that the employee,
employee of the temporary employment service or independent
contractor has not been convicted of any crime set forth in
NRS 449.174.
3. The administrator of, or the person licensed to operate, a
facility, hospital, agency, program or home is not required to obtain
the information described in subsection 1, other than the information
described in [paragraph] paragraphs (c) and (f) of subsection 1,
from an employee, employee of a temporary employment service or
independent contractor if:
(a) The employee, employee of the temporary employment
service or independent contractor agrees to allow the administrator
of, or the person licensed to operate, a facility, hospital, agency,
program or home to receive notice from the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History regarding any conviction and
subsequent conviction of the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor of a crime listed in
NRS 449.174;
(b) An agency, board or commission that regulates an
occupation or profession pursuant to title 54 of NRS or temporary
employment service has, within the immediately preceding 5 years,
submitted the fingerprints of the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(c) The report of the Federal Bureau of Investigation indicated
that the employee, employee of the temporary employment service
or independent contractor has not been convicted of any crime set
forth in NRS 449.174.
4. The administrator of, or the person licensed to operate, a
facility, hospital, agency, program or home shall ensure that the
information concerning the background and personal history of each
employee, employee of a temporary employment service or
independent contractor who works at the facility, hospital, agency,
program or home:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, is completed
as soon as practicable, and if residential services are provided to
children or the facility is a psychiatric hospital that provides
inpatient services to children or a psychiatric residential treatment
facility, before the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor provides any care or
services to a child in the facility, hospital, agency, program or home
without supervision; and
(b) Is completed at least once every 5 years after the date of the
initial investigation.
5. The administrator or person shall, when required:
(a) Obtain one set of fingerprints from the employee, employee
of the temporary employment service or independent contractor;
(b) Obtain written authorization from the employee, employee
of the temporary employment service or independent contractor to
forward the fingerprints obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) to the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report;
[and]
(c) Submit the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History or, if the fingerprints were submitted
electronically, obtain proof of electronic submission of the
fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History [.] ; and
(d) Obtain written authorization from the employee, employee
of the temporary employment service or independent contractor
for the release of any information that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry and any equivalent registry maintained
by a governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the employee,
employee of the temporary employment service or independent
contractor has resided within the immediately preceding 5 years to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
determine whether there has been a substantiated report of child
abuse or neglect made against the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor.
6. Upon receiving fingerprints submitted pursuant to this
section, the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History shall determine whether the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor has been
convicted of a crime listed in NRS 449.174 and immediately inform
the Division and the administrator of, or the person licensed to
operate, the facility, hospital, agency, program or home at which the
person works whether the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor has been convicted
of such a crime.
7. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History may impose a fee upon a facility, hospital, agency, program
or home that submits fingerprints pursuant to this section for the
reasonable cost of the investigation. The facility, hospital, agency,
program or home may recover from the employee or independent
contractor whose fingerprints are submitted not more than one-half
of the fee imposed by the Central Repository. If the facility,
hospital, agency, program or home requires the employee or
independent contractor to pay for any part of the fee imposed by the
Central Repository, it shall allow the employee or independent
contractor to pay the amount through periodic payments. The
facility, hospital, agency, program or home may require a temporary
employment service which employs a temporary employee whose
fingerprints are submitted to pay the fee imposed by the Central
Repository. A facility, hospital, agency, program or home shall
notify a temporary employment service if a person employed by the
temporary employment service is determined to be ineligible to
provide services at the facility, hospital, agency, program or home
based upon the results of an investigation conducted pursuant to this
section.
8. Unless a greater penalty is provided by law, a person who
willfully provides a false statement or information in connection
with an investigation of the background and personal history of the
person pursuant to this section that would disqualify the person from
employment, including, without limitation, a conviction of a crime
listed in NRS 449.174, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 5. NRS 449.4329 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.4329 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, within 10 days after hiring an employee, accepting an
employee of a temporary employment service or entering into a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
contract with an independent contractor, the holder of a certificate to
operate an intermediary service organization shall:
(a) Obtain a written statement from the employee, employee of
the temporary employment service or independent contractor stating
whether he or she has been convicted of any crime listed in
subsection 1 of NRS 449.4332;
(b) Obtain an oral and written confirmation of the information
contained in the written statement obtained pursuant to
paragraph (a);
(c) Obtain proof that the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor holds any required
license, permit or certificate;
(d) Obtain from the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor one set of
fingerprints and a written authorization to forward the fingerprints to
the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report;
(e) Submit to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History the fingerprints obtained pursuant to paragraph (d)
to obtain information on the background and personal history of
each employee, employee of a temporary employment service or
independent contractor to determine whether the person has been
convicted of any crime listed in subsection 1 of NRS 449.4332;
[and]
(f) Obtain written authorization from the employee, employee
of the temporary employment service or independent contractor
for the release of any information that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry and any equivalent registry maintained
by a governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the employee,
employee of the temporary employment service or independent
contractor has resided within the immediately preceding 5 years to
determine whether there has been a substantiated report of child
abuse or neglect made against the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor; and
(g) If an Internet website has been established pursuant to
NRS 439.942:
(1) Screen the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor using the Internet
website. Upon request of the Division, proof that the employee,
temporary employee or independent contractor was screened
pursuant to this subparagraph must be provided to the Division.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(2) Enter on the Internet website information to be
maintained on the website concerning the employee, employee of
the temporary employment service or independent contractor.
2. The holder of a certificate to operate an intermediary
service organization is not required to obtain the information
described in subsection 1 , other than the information described in
paragraph (f) of subsection 1, from an employee, employee of a
temporary employment service or independent contractor if his or
her fingerprints have been submitted to the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for its report within the immediately
preceding 6 months and the report of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation indicated that the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor has not
been convicted of any crime set forth in subsection 1 of
NRS 449.4332.
3. The holder of a certificate to operate an intermediary service
organization is not required to obtain the information described in
subsection 1, other than the information described in [paragraph]
paragraphs (c) and (f) of subsection 1, from an employee,
employee of a temporary employment service or independent
contractor if:
(a) The employee, employee of the temporary employment
service or independent contractor agrees to allow the holder of a
certificate to operate an intermediary service organization to receive
notice from the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History regarding any conviction and subsequent conviction of the
employee, employee of the temporary employment service
or independent contractor of a crime listed in subsection 1 of
NRS 449.4332;
(b) An agency, board or commission that regulates an
occupation or profession pursuant to title 54 of NRS or temporary
employment service has, within the immediately preceding 5 years,
submitted the fingerprints of the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor to the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(c) The report of the Federal Bureau of Investigation indicated
that the employee, employee of the temporary employment service
or independent contractor has not been convicted of any crime set
forth in subsection 1 of NRS 449.4332.
4. The holder of a certificate to operate an intermediary service
organization shall ensure that the information concerning the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
background and personal history of each employee, employee of a
temporary employment service or independent contractor who
works at or for the intermediary service organization is investigated
is completed as soon as practicable and at least once every 5 years
after the date of the initial investigation. The holder of the certificate
shall, when required:
(a) Obtain one set of fingerprints from the employee, employee
of the temporary employment service or independent contractor;
(b) Obtain written authorization from the employee, employee
of the temporary employment service or independent contractor to
forward the fingerprints obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) to the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for
submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report;
[and]
(c) Submit the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History or, if the fingerprints were submitted
electronically, obtain proof of electronic submission of the
fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History [.] ; and
(d) Obtain written authorization from the employee, employee
of the temporary employment service or independent contractor
for the release of any information that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry and any equivalent registry maintained
by a governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the employee,
employee of the temporary employment service or independent
contractor has resided within the immediately preceding 5 years to
determine whether there has been a substantiated report of child
abuse or neglect made against the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor.
5. Upon receiving fingerprints submitted pursuant to this
section, the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History shall determine whether the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor has been
convicted of a crime listed in subsection 1 of NRS 449.4332 and
immediately inform the Division and the holder of the certificate to
operate an intermediary service organization for which the person
works whether the employee, employee of the temporary
employment service or independent contractor has been convicted
of such a crime.
6. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History may impose a fee upon an intermediary service organization
that submits fingerprints pursuant to this section for the reasonable
cost of the investigation. The intermediary service organization may
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
recover from the employee or independent contractor whose
fingerprints are submitted not more than one-half of the fee imposed
by the Central Repository. If the intermediary service organization
requires the employee or independent contractor to pay for any part
of the fee imposed by the Central Repository, it shall allow the
employee or independent contractor to pay the amount through
periodic payments. The intermediary service organization may
require a temporary employment service which employs a
temporary employee whose fingerprints are submitted to pay the fee
imposed by the Central Repository. An intermediary service
organization shall notify a temporary employment service if a
person employed by the temporary employment service is
determined to be ineligible to provide services to the intermediary
service organization based upon the results of an investigation
conducted pursuant to this section.
7. Unless a greater penalty is provided by law, a person who
willfully provides a false statement or information in connection
with an investigation of the background and personal history of the
person pursuant to this section that would disqualify the person from
employment, including, without limitation, a conviction of a crime
listed in subsection 1 of NRS 449.4332, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 6. NRS 449.4331 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.4331 1. Upon receiving information from the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History pursuant to
NRS 449.4329, or evidence from any other source, that an
employee, employee of a temporary employment service or
independent contractor of an intermediary service organization has
[been] :
(a) Been convicted of a crime listed in subsection 1 of NRS
449.4332 [, the] ; or
(b) Had a substantiated report of abuse or neglect of a child
made against him or her, if he or she will provide services for a
person with a disability or a child,
 the holder of the certificate to operate the intermediary service
organization shall terminate the employment or contract of that
person or notify the temporary employment service that its
employee is prohibited from providing services for the intermediary
service organization after allowing the person time to correct the
information as required pursuant to subsection 2.
2. If an employee, employee of a temporary employment
service or independent contractor believes that the information
provided by the Central Repository , Statewide Central Registry or
any equivalent registry maintained by a governmental entity in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
another jurisdiction is incorrect, the employee, employee of the
temporary employment service or independent contractor may
immediately inform the intermediary service organization. The
intermediary service organization that is so informed shall give the
employee, employee of the temporary employment service or
independent contractor a reasonable amount of time of not less than
30 days to correct the information received from the Central
Repository , Statewide Central Registry or any equivalent registry
maintained by a governmental entity in another jurisdiction before
terminating the employment or contract of the person pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. An intermediary service organization that has complied with
NRS 449.4329 may not be held civilly or criminally liable based
solely upon the ground that the intermediary service organization
allowed an employee, employee of a temporary employment service
or independent contractor to work:
(a) Before it received the information concerning the employee,
employee of the temporary employment service or independent
contractor from the Central Repository [;] , Statewide Central
Registry or any equivalent registry maintained by a governmental
agency in another jurisdiction;
(b) During the period required pursuant to subsection 2 to allow
the employee, employee of the temporary employment service or
independent contractor to correct that information;
(c) Based on the information received from the Central
Repository, Statewide Central Registry or any equivalent registry
maintained by a governmental agency in another jurisdiction if
the information received [from the Central Repository] was
inaccurate; or
(d) Any combination thereof.
 An intermediary service organization may be held liable for any
other conduct determined to be negligent or unlawful.
Sec. 7. NRS 449.4332 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.4332 In addition to the grounds listed in NRS 449.4321,
the Division may deny a certificate to operate an intermediary
service organization to an applicant or may suspend or revoke a
certificate of a holder of a certificate to operate an intermediary
service organization if:
1. The applicant for or holder of the certificate has been
convicted of:
(a) Murder, voluntary manslaughter or mayhem;
(b) Assault with intent to kill or to commit sexual assault or
mayhem;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(c) Sexual assault, statutory sexual seduction, incest, lewdness
or indecent exposure, or any other sexually related crime that is
punished as a felony;
(d) Prostitution, solicitation, lewdness or indecent exposure, or
any other sexually related crime that is punished as a misdemeanor,
if the conviction occurred within the immediately preceding 7 years;
(e) Abuse or neglect of a child or contributory delinquency;
(f) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS, within the past 7
years;
(g) A violation of any provision of NRS 200.5099 or 200.50995;
(h) Any offense involving fraud, theft, embezzlement, burglary,
robbery, fraudulent conversion or misappropriation of property,
within the immediately preceding 7 years; or
(i) Any other felony involving the use of a firearm or other
deadly weapon, within the immediately preceding 7 years; [or]
2. The holder of a certificate has continued to employ a person
who has been convicted of a crime listed in subsection 1 [.] or who
has had a substantiated report of abuse or neglect of a child made
against him or her; or
3. The holder of a certificate has had a substantiated report
of abuse or neglect of a child made against him or her.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)